District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.22

Blockbusting and steering.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person, whether or not acting for monetary gain, directly or indirectly to engage in the practices of “blockbusting” and “steering”, including, but not limited to, the commission of any 1 or more of the following acts:

(1)

To promote, induce, influence, or attempt to promote, induce, or influence a transaction in real property through any representation, means or device whatsoever calculated to induce a person to discriminate or to engage in such transaction wholly or partially in response to discrimination, prejudice, fear or unrest adduced by such means, device or representation;

(2)

To place a sign, or display any other device, either purporting to offer or tending to lead to the belief that an offer is being made for a transaction in real property that is not in fact available or offered for transaction, or which purports that any transaction in real property has occurred that in fact has not.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 222, 24 DCR 6038

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2516.
1973 Ed., § 6-2232.

Prior Codifications